sv: Cymbal sustain: Lång; Medel; Kort; Mycket lång; Annat
nl: Bekken sustain: Lang; Medium; Kort; Zeer lang; Overig
lt-LT: Lėkštės skambėjimo trukmė: Ilgas; Vidutinis; Trumpas; Labai ilgas; Kita
pt-PT: Sustentação do prato: Longo; Médio; Curto; Muito longo; Outro
th: ความกังวานของเสียงฉาบ: ยาว; ปานกลาง; สั้น; ยาวมาก; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Sustain činele: Dug; Srednji; Kratak; Vrlo dug; Ostalo
ru: Длительность звучания тарелки: Длинный; Средний; Короткий; Очень длинный; Другое
es: Sostenido del platillo: Largo; Medio; Corto; Muy largo; Otro
de: Sustain des Beckens: Lang; Mittel; Kurz; Sehr lang; Sonstige
ro-RO: Sustain cinel: Lung; Mediu; Scurt; Foarte lung; Altele
en: Cymbal sustain: Long; Medium; Short; Very long; Other
bg-BG: Състейн на чинела: Дълъг; Среден; Къс; Много дълъг; Други
el: Διάρκεια αντήχησης κύμβαλου.: Μακρύ; Μεσαίο; Σύντομο; Πολύ μακρύ; Άλλο
cs: Dotah činelů: Dlouhý; Střední; Krátký; Velmi dlouhý; Jiné
fr: Durée de résonance de la cymbale: Long; Moyen; Court; Très long; Autre
zh-CN: 钹片延音: 长; 中; 短; 极长; 其他
ko: 심벌 서스테인: 김; 중간; 짧음; 매우 김; 기타
pt-BR: Sustentação do címbalo/prato: Longo; Médio; Curto; Muito longo; Outros
sl-SI: Trajanje zvena činele: Dolg; Srednji; Kratek; Zelo dolg; Drugo
ja: シンバルサステイン: ロング; ミディアム; ショート; ベリーロング; その他
sk-SK: Dozvuk činelov: Dlhý; Stredný; Krátky; Veľmi dlhý; Iné
zh-TW: 鈸延音: 長; 中; 短; 極長; 其他
vi: Độ ngân của chũm chọe: Dài; Trung bình; Ngắn; Rất dài; Khác
nb: Cymbal-sustain: Lang; Medium; Kort; Veldig lang; Annet
tr: Zil tınlama süresi: Uzun; Orta; Kısa; Çok uzun; Diğer
da: Bækkenets klangvarighed: Lang; Medium; Kort; Meget lang; Andet
fi: Symbaalin kesto: Pitkä; Keskipitkä; Lyhyt; Erittäin pitkä; Muu
it: Piatto sustain: Lungo; Medio; Corto; Molto lungo; Altro
hu: Cintányér utóhangja: Hosszú; Közepes; Rövid; Nagyon hosszú; Egyéb
pl: Wybrzmiewanie talerza: Długi; Średni; Krótki; Bardzo długi; Inny